Utah statutes.
57-1-36.   Trust deeds -- Instruments entitled to be recorded -- Assignment of a beneficial interest.

Any trust deed, substitution of trustee, assignment of a beneficial interest under a trust deed, notice of default, trustee's deed, reconveyance of the trust property, and any instrument by which any trust deed is subordinated or waived as to priority, if acknowledged as provided by law, is entitled to be recorded. The recording of an assignment of a beneficial interest in the trust deed does not in itself impart notice of the assignment to the trustor, his heirs or personal representatives, so as to invalidate any payment made by any of them to the person holding the note, bond, or other instrument evidencing the obligation by the trust deed.

